Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.070

Special reports—Lobbyists—Late contributions or large totals. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Any lobbyist registered under RCW 29B.50.010, any person who lobbies, and any lobbyist's employer making a contribution or an aggregate of contributions to a single entity that is one thousand dollars or more during a special reporting period, as specified in RCW 29B.25.140, before a primary or general election shall file one or more special reports in the same manner and to the same extent that a contributing political committee must file under RCW 29B.25.140.

[ 2024 c 164 s 479; 2010 c 204 s 806; 2001 c 54 s 3; 1991 c 157 s 2; 1985 c 359 s 2. Formerly RCW 42.17A.625, 42.17.175.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—2001 c 54: See note following RCW 29B.25.130.